Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 4.02. Chesapeake Bay Watershed Nutrient Credit Exchange Program.
§ 62.1-44.19:15.
New or expanded facilities.

An owner or operator of a new or expanded facility shall comply with the applicable requirements of this section as a condition of the facility’s coverage under the general permit.

An owner or operator of a facility authorized by a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit first issued before July 1, 2005, that expands his facility to discharge 100,000 gallons or more per day, or an equivalent load directly into tidal waters, or 500,000 gallons or more per day, or an equivalent load, directly into nontidal waters shall demonstrate to the Department that he has acquired waste load allocations sufficient to offset any increase in his delivered total nitrogen and delivered total phosphorus loads resulting from any expansion beyond his waste load allocations or permitted design capacity as of July 1, 2005, and will install state-of-the-art nutrient removal technology at the time of the expansion.

An owner or operator of a facility authorized by a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit first issued before July 1, 2005, that expands his facility to discharge 100,000 gallons or more per day up to and including 499,999 gallons per day, or an equivalent load, directly into nontidal waters, shall demonstrate to the Department that he has acquired waste load allocations sufficient to offset any increase in his delivered total nitrogen and delivered total phosphorus loads resulting from any expansion beyond his permitted capacity as of July 1, 2005, and will install, at a minimum, biological nutrient removal technology at the time of the expansion.

An owner or operator of a facility authorized by a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit first issued before July 1, 2005, that expands his facility to discharge 40,000 gallons or more per day up to and including 99,999 gallons per day, or an equivalent load, directly into tidal or nontidal waters, shall demonstrate to the Department that he has acquired waste load allocations sufficient to offset any increase in his delivered total nitrogen and delivered total phosphorus loads resulting from any expansion beyond his permitted capacity as of July 1, 2005.

An owner or operator of a facility authorized by a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit first issued on or after July 1, 2005, to discharge 40,000 gallons or more per day, or an equivalent load, shall demonstrate to the Department that he has acquired waste load allocations sufficient to offset his delivered total nitrogen and delivered total phosphorus loads, and will install (i) at a minimum, biological nutrient removal technology at any facility authorized to discharge up to and including 99,999 gallons per day, or an equivalent load, directly into tidal and nontidal waters, or up to and including 499,999 gallons per day, or an equivalent load, to nontidal waters; and (ii) state-of-the-art nutrient removal technology at any facility authorized to discharge 100,000 gallons or more per day, or an equivalent load, directly into tidal waters, or 500,000 gallons or more per day, or an equivalent load, directly into nontidal waters.

An owner or operator of a facility treating domestic sewage authorized by a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit with a discharge greater than 1,000 gallons per day up to and including 39,999 gallons per day that has not commenced the discharge of pollutants prior to January 1, 2011, shall demonstrate to the Department that he has acquired waste load allocations sufficient to offset his delivered total nitrogen and delivered total phosphorus loads prior to commencing the discharge, except when the facility is for short-term temporary use only or when treatment of domestic sewage is not the primary purpose of the facility.

Waste load allocations required by this section to offset new or increased delivered total nitrogen and delivered total phosphorus loads shall be acquired in accordance with this subsection.

Such allocations may be acquired from one or a combination of the following:

Acquisition of all or a portion of the waste load allocations or point source nitrogen or point source phosphorus credits from one or more permitted facilities in the same tributary;

Acquisition of credits certified by the Board pursuant to §

62.1-44.19:20

. Such best management practices shall achieve reductions beyond those already required by or funded under federal or state law, or the Virginia Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan, and shall be installed in the same tributary in which the new or expanded facility is located and included as conditions of the facility’s individual Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit;

Acquisition of allocations purchased through the Nutrient Offset Fund established pursuant to § 10.1-2128.2;

Acquisition of allocations through such other means as may be approved by the Department on a case-by-case basis; or

Acquisition of credits or allocations through the implementation of best management practices on lands owned or controlled by, or under contractual obligation with, the new or expanded facility that achieve reductions greater than those currently required by or funded under federal or state law, or the Virginia Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan, subject to the approval by the Board in accordance with standards and procedures that are consistent with those established in §

62.1-44.19:20

. Any such best management practices shall be implemented on lands within the same tributary as the new or expanded facility, and any credits assigned by the Board based on those practices shall be subject to adjustment based on the relevant delivery factor, as defined in §

62.1-44.19:13

.

Until such time as the Director finds that no allocations are reasonably available in an individual tributary, the general permit shall provide for the acquisition of allocations through payments into the Nutrient Offset Fund established in § 10.1-2128.2. Such payments shall be promptly applied by the Department to achieve equivalent point or nonpoint source reductions in the same tributary beyond those reductions already required by or funded under federal or state law or the Virginia Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan. The general permit shall base the cost of each pound of allocation on (i) the estimated cost of achieving a reduction of one pound of nitrogen or phosphorus at the facility that is securing the allocation, or comparable facility, for each pound of allocation acquired; or (ii) the average cost of reducing two pounds of nitrogen or phosphorus from nonpoint sources in the same tributary for each pound of allocation acquired, whichever is higher. Upon each reissuance of the general permit, the Board may adjust the cost of each pound of allocation based on current costs and cost estimates.

The acquisition of nutrient allocations or credits from animal waste-to-energy or animal waste reduction facilities, or the acquisition of such nutrient allocations or credits from entities acting on behalf of such facilities, shall be considered point source allocations or credits for all nutrient trading purposes and shall not be subject to any otherwise applicable nonpoint source trading ratio if the best management practice being used to generate such nutrient allocations or credits is a point source nutrient removal technology. Point source nutrient removal technology shall include animal waste gasification in which lab analysis of the animal waste reveals the concentration of nutrients in the animal waste being fed into the gasifier, and the fate of the nutrients during the animal waste gasification process, is known and documented using studies such as air emissions tests and ash analyses.

2.

Such allocations or credits shall be provided for a minimum period of five years with each registration under the general permit. This subdivision shall not preclude longer-term or permanent allocations, except that such allocations are subject to modification by the Board where necessary to conform to the Chesapeake Bay TMDL.

3.

The Board shall give priority to allocations or credits acquired in accordance with subdivisions 1 a, 1 b, and 1 d. The Board shall approve allocations acquired in accordance with subdivision 1 d only after the owner or operator has demonstrated that he has made a good faith effort to acquire sufficient allocations in accordance with subdivisions 1 a, 1 b, and 1 d and that such allocations are not reasonably available taking into account timing, cost, and other relevant factors.

4.

Notwithstanding the priority provisions in subdivision 3, the Board may grant a waste load allocation in accordance with subdivision 1 d to an owner or operator of a facility authorized by a Virginia Pollution Abatement permit to land apply domestic sewage if (i) the Virginia Pollution Abatement permit was issued before July 1, 2005; (ii) the waste load allocation does not exceed such facility’s permitted design capacity as of July 1, 2005; (iii) the waste treated by the existing facility is going to be treated and discharged pursuant to a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit for a new discharge; and (iv) the owner or operator installs state-of-the-art nutrient removal technology at such facility. Such facilities cannot generate credits or waste load allocations, based upon the removal of land application sites, that can be acquired by other permitted facilities to meet the requirements of this article.

History.

2005, cc. 708, 710; 2007, c. 27; 2010, c. 288; 2011, cc. 440, 524; 2012, cc. 748, 808; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 137, 377.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 748 and 808, cl. 2 provides: “That by July 1, 2013, the State Water Control Board shall reevaluate its trading ratio for nutrient allocation acquisition pursuant to subdivision B 1 b of §

62.1-44.19:15

of the Code of Virginia, giving full consideration to similar trading ratios established by § 10.1-603.8:1 of the Code of Virginia, § 10.1-603.15:2 as added by this act, and trading programs in other Chesapeake Bay watershed states. The Board shall establish an advisory group of interested stakeholders for the purpose of receiving recommendations during the reevaluation regarding an appropriate ratio. If warranted based on the outcome of the reevaluation, the Board shall adopt a revised trading ratio for purposes of subdivision B 1 b of §

62.1-44.19:15

as soon as practicable following the completion of the reevaluation.”

Acts 2012, cc. 748 and 808, cl. 3 provides: “That until the effective date of the regulations to be adopted pursuant to § 10.1-603.15:2 as added by this act, the State Water Control Board shall continue to certify nutrient credits from the use of nonpoint source best management practices pursuant to subdivision B 1 b of §

62.1-44.19:15

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 6 provides: “That upon the Governor’s approval of the provisions of this act, the Department of Environmental Quality shall seek the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to return delegation of program authority to the State Water Control Board for the issuance of the national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges for MS4 and construction activities under the federal Clean Water Act. Permits issued by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board or a Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program authority or a Virginia Stormwater Management Program authority acting under the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board’s authority that have not expired or been revoked or terminated before or on the program transfer date shall continue to remain in full force and effect until their specified expiration dates.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 27 added subdivision B 3.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 288 added subdivision A 5.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 440 added subsection D.

The 2011 amendment by c. 524 added subdivision B 1 c; redesignated former subdivision B 1 c as subdivision B 1 d, and therein deleted “in accordance with the terms of the general permit or” following “allocations”; in subdivisions B 2 and B 3, updated the subdivision references; and in subsection C, in the first sentence, substituted “Director” for “Board” and “Nutrient Offset Fund established in § 10.1-2128.2” for “Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund established in § 10.1-2128,” and in the second sentence, inserted “by the Department.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 748 and 808 are identical, and inserted “or point source nitrogen or point source phosphorus credits” in subdivision B 1 a; in subdivision B 1 b, substituted “credits certified by the Board pursuant to §

62.1-44.19:20

or certified by the Soil and Water Conservation Board pursuant to § 10.1-603.15:2” for “nonpoint source load allocations through the use of best management practices acquired through a public or private entity acting on behalf of the land owner” in the first sentence, and “Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan” for “tributaries strategies plans” in the second sentence; inserted subdivision B 2 and redesignated former subdivisions B 2 and 3 as subdivisions B 3 and 4, and made related changes; inserted “or credits” following “priority to allocations” in subdivision B 3; substituted “Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan” for “tributaries strategies plans” in the second sentence of subsection C; and in subsection D, substituted “or credits” for “credits; or offsets” throughout, and in the first sentence, deleted “pursuant to subdivision B 1” following “such facilities” and substituted “any otherwise applicable nonpoint source” for “a two-for-one.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 756 and 793 are identical, and deleted “or certified by the Soil and Water Conservation Board pursuant to § 10.1-603.15:2” at the end of the first sentence of subdivision B 1 b.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by c. 137 and 377 are identical, and added subdivision B 1 e; in subdivision B 2, deleted “the Board from adopting” preceding “longer-term or permanent” and substituted “allocations, except that such allocations are subject to modification by the Board where necessary to conform to the Chesapeake Bay TMDL” for “allocation requirements by regulation.”

§ 62.1-44.19:16.
Technology-based standards and effluent limitations.

The Board may establish a technology-based standard less stringent than the applicable standard specified in §

62.1-44.19:15

based on a demonstration by an owner or operator that the specified standard is not technically or economically feasible for the affected facility or that the technology-based standard would require the owner or operator to construct treatment facilities not otherwise necessary to comply with his waste load allocation without reliance on nutrient credit exchanges pursuant to §

62.1-44.19:18

.

The Board may include technology-based effluent concentration limitations in the individual permit for any facility that has installed technology for the control of nitrogen and phosphorus whether by new construction, expansion, or upgrade. Such limitations shall be based upon the technology installed by the facility and shall be expressed as annual average limitations. Such limitations shall not affect the generation, acquisition, or exchange of allocations or credits pursuant to this article.

History.

2005, cc. 708, 710.

§ 62.1-44.19:17.
Virginia Nutrient Credit Exchange Association authorized; duties; composition; appointment; terms.

The permittees under the general permit may establish a nonstock corporation under Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1, to be known as the Virginia Nutrient Credit Exchange Association, to coordinate and facilitate participation in the nutrient credit exchange program by its members. The Virginia Nutrient Credit Exchange Association, which is hereafter referred to as the Association, may (i) submit on behalf of the permittees the compliance plans required by §

62.1-44.19:14

, (ii) develop a standard form of agreement for use by permittees when buying and selling nitrogen and phosphorus allocations and credits, (iii) assist permittees in identifying buyers and sellers of nitrogen and phosphorus allocations and credits, (iv) coordinate planning to ensure that to the extent possible, sufficient credits are available each year to achieve full compliance with the general permit, (v) assist individual municipal permittees in utilizing public-private partnerships and other innovative measures to achieve the Commonwealth’s water quality goals, and (vi) perform such other duties and functions as may be necessary to the effective and efficient implementation of the credit exchange program. The Association shall not assume any of the permittees’ compliance obligations under the general permit.

Only permittees under the general permit may become members of the Association. The Association shall operate through a board of directors, which shall consist of 10 members and be representative of the membership in the Association. Association board members shall be employees of Association members, shall be elected by the Association membership at the beginning of each term of the general permit, and shall serve through the end of the permit term to which they were elected. Vacancies for unexpired Association board terms shall be filled in the same manner in which members are originally elected to the Association board.

The Association board shall elect a president, vice-president, secretary, and treasurer from among its members at the beginning of each permit term. Officers and Association board members shall receive no compensation for their services as officers and board members of the Association.

History.

2005, cc. 708, 710.

§ 62.1-44.19:18.
Nutrient allocation compliance and reporting.

Each permitted facility shall be in compliance with its individual waste load allocations if: (i) its annual mass load is less than the applicable waste load allocation assigned to the facility in the general permit; (ii) the permitted facility acquires sufficient point source nitrogen or phosphorus credits in accordance with subdivision 1; or (iii) in the event it is unable to meet the individual waste load allocation pursuant to clauses (i) or (ii), the permitted facility acquires sufficient nitrogen or phosphorus credits through payments made in accordance with subdivision 2, provided, however, that the acquisition of nitrogen or phosphorus credits pursuant to this section shall not alter or otherwise affect the individual waste load allocations for each permitted facility.

A permittee may acquire point source nitrogen or phosphorus credits from one or more permitted facilities only if (i) the credits are generated and applied to a compliance obligation in the same calendar year, (ii) the credits are generated by one or more permitted facilities in the same tributary, except that permitted facilities in the Eastern Coastal Basin may also acquire credits from permitted facilities in the Potomac and Rappahannock tributaries, (iii) the credits are acquired no later than June 1 immediately following the calendar year in which the credits are applied, and (iv) no later than June 1 immediately following the calendar year in which the credits are applied, the permittee certifies on a form supplied by the Department that he has acquired sufficient credits to satisfy his compliance obligations.

A permittee may acquire nitrogen or phosphorus credits through payments made into the Nutrient Offset Fund established in § 10.1-2128.2 only if, no later than June 1 immediately following the calendar year in which the credits are applied, the permittee certifies on a form supplied by the Department that he has diligently sought, but has been unable to acquire, sufficient credits to satisfy his compliance obligations through the acquisition of point source nitrogen or phosphorus credits with other permitted facilities in the same tributary, and that he has acquired sufficient credits to satisfy his compliance obligations through one or more payments made in accordance with the terms of the general permit.

Until such time as the Director finds that no credits are reasonably available in an individual tributary, the general permit shall provide for the acquisition of nitrogen and phosphorus credits through payments into the Nutrient Offset Fund in accordance with subdivision A 2. Such payments shall be promptly applied to achieve equivalent point or nonpoint source reductions in the same tributary beyond those reductions already required by or funded under federal or state law, or the Virginia Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan. The general permit shall base the cost of each nitrogen or phosphorus credit on the average cost of reducing one pound of nitrogen or phosphorus from Virginia publicly owned wastewater treatment facilities for each credit acquired. Upon each reissuance of the general permit, the Board may adjust the cost of each nitrogen and phosphorus credit based on (i) the current average cost of reducing a pound of nitrogen or phosphorus from Virginia publicly owned wastewater treatment facilities for each credit acquired and (ii) any additional incentives reasonably necessary to ensure that there is timely and continuing progress toward attaining and maintaining each tributary’s combined waste load allocation.

On or before February 1, annually, each permittee shall file a discharge monitoring report with the Department identifying the annual mass load of total nitrogen and the annual mass load of total phosphorus discharged by each permitted facility during the previous calendar year. The report shall contain the certification required by federal and state law and be signed by each permittee for each of the permittee’s facilities covered by the general permit.

On or before April 1, annually, the Department shall prepare a report containing the annual mass load of total nitrogen and annual mass load of total phosphorus discharged by each permitted facility, the number of point source nitrogen and phosphorus credits for the previous calendar year generated or required by each such facility, and to the extent there are insufficient point source credits available for exchange to provide for full compliance by every permittee, the number of credits to be purchased pursuant to this section. Upon completion of the report, the Department shall promptly publish notice of the report and make the report available to any person requesting it.

On or before July 1, annually, the Department shall publish notice of all nitrogen and phosphorus credit exchanges and purchases for the previous calendar year and make all documents relating to the exchanges and purchases available to any person requesting them.

History.

2005, cc. 708, 710; 2010, c. 11; 2011, c. 524; 2012, cc. 748, 808.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 361 and 704, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The State Water Control Board shall accept petitions through July 10, 2009, for purposes of the expedited process set forth in this section, from the facilities subject to waste load allocations for two or more design flows based on their respective certificates to operate as of December 31, 2010. The petitions shall be for the sole purpose of extending the deadline to no later than December 31, 2015, to obtain the certificate to operate at the higher design flow, subject to the condition that such facilities shall nevertheless be required to comply with such nutrient allocations as of January 1, 2011, whether by point source nutrient credit exchanges under §

62.1-44.19:14

of the Code of Virginia or otherwise. The State Water Control Board shall, with respect to these facilities, approve or deny such petitions and adopt any regulation amendments to incorporate any approved petitions within 180 days of the petition deadline. Prior to a final decision on the petitions, the State Water Control Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment.”

Acts 2009, cc. 361 and 704, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Water Control Board’s adoption of any regulation amendments made pursuant to this act shall be exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia of the Administrative Process Act.”

Acts 2009, cc. 361 and 704, cl. 3 provides: “That this act shall not prohibit any person from petitioning the State Water Control Board at any time to amend existing nutrient waste load allocations pursuant to §

2.2-4007

.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 11 added the exception at the end of clause (ii) of subdivision A 1.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 524, in subdivision A 2, substituted “Nutrient Offset Fund established in § 10.1-2128.2” for “Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund established in § 10.12128”; and in subsection B, substituted “Director” for “Board” and “Nutrient Offset Fund” for “Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 748 and 808 are identical, and substituted “Eastern Coastal Basin” for “Eastern Shore basin” in A 1 (ii); substituted “Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan” for “tributaries strategies plans” in the second sentence of subsection B; rewrote subsection C, which read: “On or before February 1, annually, each permittee shall either individually or through the Association file a report with the Department. The report shall identify (i) the annual mass load of total nitrogen and the annual mass load of total phosphorus discharged by each permitted facility during the previous calendar year, (ii) the delivered total nitrogen load and delivered total phosphorus load discharged by each permitted facility during the previous year, and (iii) the number of total nitrogen and total phosphorus credits for the previous calendar year to be purchased or sold by the permittee. The report shall contain the certification required by federal and state law and be signed by each permittee for each of the permittee’s facilities covered by the general permit.”; substituted “generated or required” for “for sale or purchase” in the first sentence of subsection D; and updated internal references throughout.

§ 62.1-44.19:19.
Program audits.

In addition to its permit compliance and enforcement authority, the Department is authorized to conduct such audits of the Association and permittees as it deems necessary to ensure that the reports and data received from permittees and the Association are complete and accurate. The Association and permittees under the general permit shall cooperate with the Department in the conduct of such audits and provide the Department with such information as the Department may require to fulfill its responsibilities under this article.

History.

2005, cc. 708, 710.